Hawaii statutes.
[§321-20] Remedies. Notwithstanding
other penalties, the director may enforce this chapter in either administrative
or judicial proceedings:

(1) Administrative. If the director determines that
any person is violating any provision of this chapter, any rule adopted
thereunder, or any variance or exemption or waiver issued pursuant thereto, the
director may have that person served with a notice of violation and an order.
The notice shall specify the alleged violation. The order may require that the
alleged violator do any or all of the following: cease and desist from the
violation, pay an administrative penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each day of
violation, correct the violation at the alleged violator's own expense, or
appear before the director at a time and place specified in the order and
answer the charges complained of. The order shall become final twenty days
after service unless within those twenty days the alleged violator requests in
writing a hearing before the director. Upon such request the director shall
specify a time and place for the alleged violator to appear. When the director
issues an order for immediate action to protect the public health from an
imminent and substantial danger, the department shall provide an opportunity
for a hearing within twenty-four hours after service of the order. After a
hearing pursuant to this subsection, the director may affirm, modify, or
rescind the order as appropriate. The director may institute a civil action in
any court of appropriate jurisdiction for the enforcement of any order issued
pursuant to this subsection.

Factors to be considered in imposing the
administrative penalty include the nature and history of the violation and any
prior violation and the opportunity, difficulty, and history of corrective
action. It is presumed that the violator's economic and financial conditions
allow payment of the penalty and the burden of proof to the contrary is on the
violator. In any judicial proceeding to enforce the administrative penalty
imposed pursuant to this chapter, the director need only show that notice was
given, a hearing was held or the time granted for requesting a hearing had
expired without such a request, the administrative penalty imposed, and that
the penalty imposed remains unsatisfied.

This section does not supersede specific
administrative penalties provided elsewhere.

(2) Judicial. The director may institute a civil
action in any court of appropriate jurisdiction for injunctive relief to
prevent violation of any order issued or rule adopted pursuant to this chapter,
in addition to any other remedy or penalty provided for under this chapter. [L
1985, c 84, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next